src/twol-sms.txt
!
!! "Even syllabic verbs I, vowel position I > II-III"
!!  Vx:Vy <=> (C:+) _ V: (ˊ:) C:+ (X3:) [ %^2VOW: | %^3VOW: ] ;
!!  		where Vx in (â o e å ä)
!!  			  Vy in (õ u i o a)
!!  		matched ;
!! 
!! "Even syllabic verbs I, vowel position II > I"
!!  Vx:Vy <=> (C:+) _ V: ˊ:0 C:+ (X3:) %^1VOW: ;
!!  		   (C:+) V: _ ˊ:0 C:+ (X3:) %^1VOW: ;
!!  		   (C:+) _ ˊ:0 C:+ %^1VOW: ;
!!  		where Vx in (õ u i o a)
!!  			  Vy in (â o e å ä)
!!  		matched ;
!! 
!! ! 2012-06-01 This appears to depart from a vowel with "ˊ"
!! ! so it must be III > IV
!! "Even syllabic verbs I, vowel position II > IV"
!!  Vx:Vy <=> (C:+) _ V:0 ˊ C:+ %^4VOW: ;
!!  		where Vx in (õ u i o a)
!!  			  Vy in (â o e å ä)
!!  		matched ;
!! 
!! "Even syllabic verbs I, diftong position I > II â:õ"
!!  â:õ <=> (C:+) [ e: | u: ] _ (ˊ:) C:+ (X3:) [ %^2VOW: | %^3VOW: ] ;
!! 
!! "Even syllabic verbs I, diftong position I > II ä:a"
!!  ä:a <=> (C:+) [ e: | u: ] _ (ˊ:) C:+ (X3:) %^2VOW: ;
!! 
!! "Even syllabic verbs I, diftong position I > II ä:e"
!!  ä:e <=> (C:+) [ e: | u: ] _ (ˊ:) C:+ (X3:) %^3VOW: ;
!! 
!! 
!! "Even syllabic verbs I, diftong position II > I & IV i:e"
!!  i:e <=> (C:+) _ [ õ:â | a:ä ] (ˊ) C:+ (X3:) [ %^1VOW: | %^4VOW: ] ;
!! 
!! "Even syllabic verbs I, diftong position II > I & IV õ:â"
!!  Vx:Vy <=> (C:+) [ i:e | u: ] _ (ˊ) C:+ (X3:) [ %^1VOW: | %^4VOW: ] ;
!!  		where Vx in (õ a)
!!  			  Vy in (â ä)
!!  		matched ;
!! 
!! "Even syllabic verbs I, diftong position II > III a:e"
!!  a:e <=> (C:+) [ i: | u: ] _ (ˊ) C:+ (X3:) [ %^3VOW: ] ;
!! 
!! 
!! !e:â e:õ
!! "Even syllabic verbs I, diftong position V > I & IV i:e"
!!  i:e <=> (C:+) _ [e: | â:] ˊ: C:+ (X3:) [ %^1VOW: | %^4VOW: ] ;
!! 
!! "Even syllabic verbs I, diftong position V > I & IV e:â"
!!  e:â <=> (C:+) [i: | u:] _ ˊ: C:+ (X3:) [ %^1VOW: | %^4VOW: ] ;
!! 
!! "Even syllabic verbs I, diftong position V > I & IV â:ä"
!!  â:ä <=> (C:+) [i: | u:] _ ˊ: C:+ (X3:) [ %^1VOW: | %^4VOW: ] ;
!! 
!! "Even syllabic verbs I, diftong position V > II & III e:õ"
!!  e:õ <=> (C:+) [ i: | u: ] _ ˊ: C:+ (X3:) [ %^2VOW: | %^3VOW: ] ;
!! 
!! !! 2012-06-01 Unresolved <= conflict with respect to 'â:õ' vs. 'â:a'
!! !! between "Even syllabic verbs I, diftong position I > II â:õ"
!! !! and "Even syllabic verbs I, diftong position V > II & III â:a"
!! !TEMPORARY REMOVAL
!! !"Even syllabic verbs I, diftong position V > II & III â:a"
!! ! â:a <=> (C:+) [ i: | u: ] _ ˊ: C:+ (X3:)   %^2VOW: ;
!! !!
!! !!2012-06-01
!! !! Warning: Unresolved <= conflict with respect to 'â:õ' vs. 'â:e'
!! !!    between "Even syllabic verbs I, diftong position I > II â:õ"
!! !!        and "Even syllabic verbs I, diftong position V > II & III â:e"
!! !! TEMPORARY REMOVAL
!! !"Even syllabic verbs I, diftong position V > II & III â:e"
!! ! â:e <=> (C:+) [ i: | u: ] _ ˊ C:+ (X3:) %^3VOW: ;
!! 
!! 
!! 
! Consonant grad rules

!! Weakening Consonant Cluster

!dealing with relative length changes
! mõõnnâd : mõˊnne : mõõn 
!"Even syllabic verbs I, cg in relation to Vowel length"

! V Cx Cx:0 
! used with  +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg
! teevvad > teev
"Even syllabic verbs I, cg"
 Cx:0 <=> :V (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) Cx _ (%^VOWL: ) %^CShort: ;
          V: 0:V (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) Cx _ %^VOWXL: ;    
 		where Cx in (đ l r m n v) ;

!! "Even syllabic verbs I, cg vv:v"
!! v:0 <=> :V (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) v _ (%^VOWL: ) %^CShort: ; 

! used with  +N+Sg+Nom > +N+Sg+Gen
! kuss > kuuzz
"Even syllabic nouns I, with extra lengthening of vowel V>VV and SS>ZZ"
 Cx:Cy <=> [#: | C: ] V: (0:V) (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) Cx: _ %^VOWXL: ;
          [#: | C: ] V: (0:V) (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) _ Cx: %^VOWXL: ;
                where Cx in (k s)
                      Cy in (ǥ z)
                matched ;

! used with  +N+Sg+Nom > +N+Sg+Gen
! sijdd > siid
"Even syllabic nouns I, with extra lengthening of vowel ij>ii/uv>uu and dd>d"
 Cx:0 <=> [ u: (0:u | 0:o ) (%ˊ: ) v: | i: (%ˊ: ) j: ] ( 0:%ˊ) Cx _ %^VOWXL: ;
 ! juˊrdded > joordam
          [ V: | :V ] (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) CNoJV Cx _ (%^VOWL: ) %^CShort: ;
                where Cx in (d) ;



! This is used with +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg 
! double consonants at coda that become voiced in gradation
"Even syllabic verbs I, Voicing" ! ss:zz,
 Cx:Cy <=> V: (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) Cx: _ %^VOWL: %^CShort: ;
           V: (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) _ Cx: %^VOWL: %^CShort: ; !This was X3
                where Cx in (s š c č k)
                      Cy in (z ž ʒ j ǥ)
                matched ;

! V Ca Cx Cx:0
! This is used with +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg
! double consonants following consonant at coda that become 
! single consonants in gradation
"Even syllabic verbs I, third consonant loss" ! lgg:lǥ
 Cx:0 <=> [ V: | :V ] (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ)  [ s | r | l | p | d: ] Cx:  _ %^VOWL: %^CShort: ;
                where Cx in (k ǩ g ǧ ŋ t č c s m n) ;

! This is used with +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg
! double consonants following vowel and "i" at coda that become
! single consonants in gradation
! njeiddad > njeeid
! 2012-06-12 _v:u_ allows for u´vdded
"Even syllabic verbs I, third consonant loss idd:id" ! idd:id
 d:0 <=> V: (0:V) [ i | v:u ] (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) d: _ %^VOWL: %^CShort: ;


"Even syllabic verbs I, t>đ" ! tt:đ
 t:đ  <=> V: (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) _ t:0 %^VOWL: %^CShort: ;

"Even syllabic verbs I, second consonant loss"
 Cx:0 <=> V: (%ˊ: | 0:%ˊ) Cx: _ %^VOWL: %^CShort: ;
                where Cx in (t) ; ! Extend

! vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2 => vuâlǥak
"Even syllabic verbs I, lgg>lǥ" ! lgg:lǥ
 g:ǥ  <=> V: (%ˊ:0 ) [ l | r | d: ]  _ g:0 %^VOWL: %^CShort: ;

!vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1 => vuõˊljim
"Even syllabic verbs I, 'lǧǧ>'lj" ! 
 g:j  <=> V:  :%ˊ [ l | r | d: ]  _ g:0 %^VOWL: %^CShort: ( %^VOWLower: | %^VOWRaise: ) (%^VOWFront: ) (X3:) %^PAL: ;


!! Strengthening Consonant Cluster
! V shortening and C lengthening 
! %^CLong is generally used in conjunction with a preceding %^VOWSH
! In verbs this will be observed in finite forms
! In derivational morphology, e.g. -škuetted, this is not the case


! kååˊmmerd 
"Orthographic Consonant lengthening in INDPRSSG3 and IMPSG2"
 0:Cx <=> V: ( :V ) ( %ˊ ) :C* Cx _ [ QE1: ] C:+ [ %^IMPSG2: | %^INDPRSSG3: ] ;
            where Cx in (m) ;



!! 
!! !! 2009: 20
!! "Even-syllabic nouns, In gg or ǧǧ"
!!  Cx:Cy <=> V: [ (ˊ:) [ d: | l | r ]| [ u: | i: ] (ˊ:) ] _ X3: ;
!!               where Cx in (ǧ g)
!!                     Cy in (j ǥ)
!!               matched ;
!! 
!! ! ǩeäˊdǧǧ: ǩieˊđjest
!! ! ǩeäˊdǧǧ: ǩeäđǥaž
!! 
!! "xx:x rule"
!!  Cx:0 <=> V ( ˊ: ) Cx _ V X3:0 ;
!! ! to be refined…
!! 
!! ! goal:
!! ! mõõnnâd:mõõˊnn	POORRÂD ;
!! ! 
!! 
